Massachusetts, session 194th, H2783.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, subsection (g) is hereby amended by eliminating the definition of Group 1 and 
amending Group 2 after the word “hospital”, in line 283, by adding the following new line:- 
Officials and general employees including clerical, administrative, and technical workers, 
laborers, mechanics, and all others not otherwise classified.